Maryland, session 2026, SB0862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–804.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall make grants from or agreements for the use of State
funds, including the funds provided under § 9–1A–33 of the State Government Article, and
federal funds to help public agencies or nonprofit organizations operate the network of
clinically appropriate services for problem gamblers who reside in the State to provide the
following:
(i) Inpatient and residential services;
(ii) Outpatient services;
(iii) Intensive outpatient services;
(iv) Continuing care services;
(v) Educational services;
(vi) Services for victims of domestic violence; and
(vii) Other preventive or rehabilitative services or treatment.
(2) Research and training that are designed to improve or extend these
services are proper items of expense.
(b) The Secretary shall conduct [a]:
(1) A prevalence study and replication prevalence studies to measure the
rate of problem and pathological IN–PERSON gambling in the State; AND
(2) A PREVALENCE STUDY AND REPLICATION PREVALENCE STUDIES
TO MEASURE THE RATE OF PROBLEM AND PATHOLOGICAL MOBILE GAMBLING IN
THE STATE.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Secretary shall contract
with an independent researcher to conduct the prevalence studies.
(2) The Secretary shall utilize the most current psychiatric or diagnostic
criteria for problem and pathological gambling as the basis for the prevalence studies.

SENATE BILL 862 3
(d) (1) The initial prevalence study ON PROBLEM AND PATHOLOGICAL
IN–PERSON GAMBLING IN THE STATE shall be completed on or before July 1, 2009.
(2) THE INITIAL PREVALENCE STUDY ON PROBLEM AND
PATHOLOGICAL MOBILE GAMBLING IN THE STATE SHALL BE COMPLETED ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2031.
(e) Replication prevalence studies shall be conducted no less than every 5 years
with measures taken to permit comparisons between the initial prevalence study and
subsequent replication prevalence studies.
(f) Services under this subtitle shall be provided by public agencies or, under
contract, by nonprofit organizations.
Article – State Government
9–1A–33.
(b) (7) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH NOVEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, ON HOW
THE FUNDS IN THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND HAVE BEEN EXPENDED ON
PROBLEM GAMBLING TREATMENT AND PREVENTION PROGRAMS UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
9–1D–04.
(a) A fantasy competition operator shall retain [85%] 84% of the proceeds and
pay the remainder to the Commission.
(b) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Commission shall distribute the proceeds paid under subsection (a) of
this section to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under § 5–206 of the
Education Article.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL DISTRIBUTE 1% OF THE PROCEEDS
FROM FANTASY COMPETITIONS TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE.
9–1E–12.
(a) (1) The Commission shall account to the Comptroller for all of the revenue
under this subtitle.

SENATE BILL 862
(2) The proceeds from sports wagering, less the amount retained by the
licensee under subsection (b)(1) of this section, shall be under the control of the Comptroller
and distributed as provided under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, all proceeds from sports wagering shall be electronically transferred monthly
into the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1 of this title.
(ii) A Class A–1 and A–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain [85%] 84% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the locations described
in § 9–1E–09(a) of this subtitle.
(iii) A Class B–1 and B–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain [85%] 84% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the location described
in the licensee’s application.
(iv) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall retain [80%] 79% of the
proceeds from online sports wagering received by the licensee.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, all
proceeds from sports wagering in the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1 of
this title shall be distributed on a monthly basis, on a properly approved transmittal
prepared by the Commission to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established
under § 5–206 of the Education Article.
(ii) 1. THE COMMISSION SHALL DISTRIBUTE 1% OF ALL
SPORTS WAGERING PROCEEDS TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE.
2. For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, 5% of
the proceeds [attributable to mobile] FROM ONLINE sports wagering shall be deposited in
the General Fund.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.